Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3511
Radiation; ordinance, resolution, or regulation; superseded; when.

Any ordinance, resolution, or regulation, now or hereafter in effect, of the governing body of a municipality, county, or state agency relating to sources of radiation that is inconsistent with the Radiation Control Act, amendments thereto, or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act is superseded by the act.

Laws 1963, c. 406, § 11, p. 1304;

Laws 1975, LB 157, § 11;

Laws 1984, LB 716, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 390, § 15.